Utah statutes.
73-2-22.   Emergency flood powers -- Action to enforce orders -- Access rights to private and public property -- Injunctive relief against state engineer's decisions -- Judicial review provisions not applicable.

Whenever the state engineer, with approval of the chairman of the Disaster Emergency Advisory Council, makes a written finding that any reservoir or stream has reached or will reach during the current water year a level far enough above average and in excess of capacity that public safety is or is likely to be endangered or that substantial property damage is occurring or is likely to occur, he shall have emergency powers until the danger to the public and property is abated. Emergency powers shall consist of the authority to control stream flow and reservoir storage or release. The state engineer must protect existing water rights to the maximum extent possible when exercising emergency powers. Any action taken by the state engineer under this section shall be by written order.

If any person refuses or neglects to comply with any order of the state engineer issued pursuant to his emergency powers, the state engineer may bring action in the name of the state in the district court to enforce them. In carrying out his emergency powers, the state engineer shall have rights of access to private and public property.

Any person affected by a decision of the state engineer made under his emergency powers shall have the right to seek injunctive relief, including temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions in any district court of the county where that person resides. No order of the state engineer shall be enjoined or set aside unless shown by clear and convincing evidence that an emergency does not in fact exist or that the order of the state engineer is arbitrary or capricious. The provisions of Sections 73-3-14 and 73-3-15 shall not be applicable to any order of the state engineer issued pursuant to this section.



Enacted by Chapter 33, 1984 General Session

